Maryland, session 2026, SB0799.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0799*

SENATE BILL 799
Article – Public Utilities
1–101.
(a) In this division the following words have the meanings indicated.
(z) (1) “Public service company” means a common carrier company, electric
company, gas company, sewage disposal company, telegraph company, telephone company,
water company, or any combination of public service companies.
(2) “Public service company” does not include:
(i) a campground that provides water, electric, gas, sewage, or
telephone service to campers incident to the campground’s primary business of operating
and maintaining the campground; or
(ii) a person that owns or operates equipment used for charging
electric vehicles, including a person that owns or operates:
1. an electric vehicle charging station;
2. electric vehicle supply equipment; or
3. an electric vehicle charging station service company or
provider.
(gg) “Sewage disposal company” means a privately owned public service company
that owns or maintains facilities for the disposal of sewage.
(uu) “Water company” means a public service company that owns a water plant
and sells or distributes water for gain.
(vv) “Water plant” means the material, equipment, and property owned by a water
company and used or to be used for or in connection with water service.
4–203.
(a) Unless otherwise ordered by the Commission, a public service company may
not establish a new rate or change in rate unless the public service company:
(1) provides to the Commission notice of the new rate or change in rate at
least 30 days before the new rate is established or current rate is changed; and
(2) publishes the new rate or change in rate in accordance with § 4–202 of
this subtitle during the entire 30 day notice period in new schedules or plainly indicated
amendments to existing schedules.

SENATE BILL 799 3
(b) The public service company shall plainly set forth in the notice and
publication:
(1) the changes that it proposes to the rate schedules currently in force;
and
(2) the effective date of the changes.
(c) (1) The technical staff of the Commission may assist a water company or a
sewage disposal company in establishing a proposed just and reasonable rate.
(2) In assisting a water company or a sewage disposal company under this
subsection, the technical staff may seek information from the water company or the sewage
disposal company.
(3) The Commission shall restrict the availability of staff–assisted rate
cases authorized under this subsection to water companies or sewage disposal companies
whose gross annual revenues, for the most recent calendar year for which data are
available, are below an amount determined by the Commission, not to exceed $1,000,000.
(4) The Commission shall adopt regulations to establish formal rules for
staff–assisted rate cases authorized under this subsection.
(D) THE COMMISSION MAY NOT APPROVE A RATE INCREASE FOR A WATER
COMPANY OR A SEWAGE DISPOSAL COMPANY IF A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY HAS
COMMENCED OR INDICATED AN INTENT TO COMMENCE A CONDEMNATION
PROCEEDING IN ACCORDANCE WITH TITLE 12 OF THE REAL PROPERTY ARTICLE.
Article – Real Property
12–105.2.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “SEWAGE DISPOSAL COMPANY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
1–101 OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE.
(3) “WATER COMPANY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 1–101 OF THE
PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE.
(B) A FACT FINDER IN A CONDEMNATION PROCEEDING INVOLVING A WATER
COMPANY OR A SEWAGE DISPOSAL COMPANY SHALL CONSIDER:

SENATE BILL 799
(1) ANY REASONABLE SYSTEM UPGRADES NECESSARY FOR THE
WATER COMPANY OR SEWAGE DISPOSAL COMPANY TO PROVIDE SAFE AND RELIABLE
SERVICE; AND
(2) THE VALUE TO CUSTOMERS FROM ANY POTENTIAL REDUCTIONS
IN WATER OR SEWER BILLS IF THE WATER COMPANY OR SEWAGE DISPOSAL
COMPANY IS ACQUIRED BY A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY THROUGH CONDEMNATION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.